Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-319.04
Domestic companies; securities; transacting business in foreign state; deposit permitted.

Domestic insurers and assessment associations transacting or desiring to transact business in any other state, province, or country may deposit additional securities with the Department of Insurance in the kind and to the amount required by such other state, province, or country as a condition to transact business therein.

Laws 1955, c. 174, § 4, p. 499.